Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1289] RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Auto rental company" means a corporation, partnership, individual, or other person that is engaged primarily in the renting of at least 50 rental motor vehicles at per diem rates. new text end new text begin (c) "Rental motor vehicle" means a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or recreational vehicle made available for rental by an auto rental company. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin (a) An auto rental company may, but is not required to, apply for rental motor vehicle plates under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Upon proper application, the commissioner must issue rental motor vehicle plates or a single motorcycle plate to an auto rental company that: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a rental motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays license plate fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates for each rental motor vehicle, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax for each rental motor vehicle as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with section 168.017 and rules governing registration of rental motor vehicles. new text end new text begin (c) Rental motor vehicle plates issued under this section are issued for a seven-year period and must be replaced as required under section 168.12, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), clause (2). new text end new text begin (d) Each set of rental motor vehicle plates issued under this section is only valid if the plates are registered to a single rental motor vehicle. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the phrase "RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE." new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin (a) On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5 for each set of plates, rental motor vehicle plates may be transferred to another qualified rental motor vehicle that is registered to the same auto rental company to which the rental motor vehicle plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin (b) A deputy registrar who collects the $5 transfer fee under paragraph (a) must retain the fee. new text end new text begin (c) Rental motor vehicle plates issued under this section must be removed from the rental motor vehicle if the vehicle is held for resale under section 168A.11. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) Rental motor vehicle plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding sections 168.09, subdivision 4, and 169.79, subdivision 8, rental motor vehicle plates issued under this section are not required to display validation stickers issued pursuant to section 168.12, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, or on the date the Department of Public Safety Division of Driver and Vehicle Services makes the rental motor vehicle plates available, whichever is sooner. new text end